Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. Commonwealth Transportation Board; Membership and Organization.

§ 33.2-200.
Commonwealth Transportation Board; membership; terms; vacancies.

The Board shall have a total membership of 17 members that shall consist of 14 nonlegislative citizen members and three ex officio members as follows: the Secretary of Transportation, the Commissioner of Highways, and the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation. The nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed by the Governor as provided in §

33.2-201

, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Appointments of nonlegislative citizen members shall be for terms of four years commencing on July 1, upon the expiration of the terms of the existing members, respectively. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term and shall be effective until 30 days after the next meeting of the ensuing General Assembly and, if confirmed, thereafter for the remainder of the term. No nonlegislative citizen member shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining that member’s eligibility for reappointment. Ex officio members of the Board shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

The Secretary shall serve as chairman of the Board and shall have voting privileges only in the event of a tie. The senior nonlegislative citizen member shall serve as vice-chairman of the Board and shall preside during the absence of the chairman. In the event that more than one nonlegislative citizen member of the Board may be considered the senior nonlegislative citizen member, the Board shall elect the vice-chairman from such senior nonlegislative citizen members. The Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation and the Commissioner of Highways shall not have voting privileges.

History.

Code 1950, c. 87, §

33-1

; 1956; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-1; 1974, c. 462; 1984, c. 748; 1985, c. 448; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1990, cc. 1, 317; 1995, cc. 195, 223; 1999, cc. 636, 673; 2011, cc. 36, 152; 2013, cc. 762, 794; 2014, c. 805; 2015, cc. 374, 684.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2018, c. 743, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Commonwealth Transportation Board (the Board) be directed to study financing options for Interstate 81 corridor improvements.

“In conducting its study, the Board shall evaluate the feasibility of using toll financing to improve Interstate 81 throughout the Commonwealth. Such evaluation shall not consider options that toll all users of Interstate 81, and shall not consider tolls on commuters using Interstate 81, but may consider high-occupancy toll lanes established pursuant to
§

33.2-502

of the Code of Virginia and tolls on heavy commercial vehicles. The Board, with the support of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment, shall develop and adopt an Interstate 81 Corridor Improvement Plan (Plan). Such Plan shall include the examination of the entire length of Interstate 81 and the methods of financing such improvements, and such Plan may include tolls imposed or collected on heavy commercial vehicles but shall not include tolls on commuters using Interstate 81.

“At a minimum, in the development of such Plan, the Board shall:

“1. Designate specific segments of the Interstate 81 corridor for improvement;

“2. Identify a targeted set of improvements for each segment that may be financed or funded in such segment and evaluated using the statewide prioritization process pursuant to
§

33.2-214.1

of the Code of Virginia;

“3. Ensure that in the overall plan of expenditure and distribution of any toll revenues or other financing means evaluated, each segment’s total long-term benefit shall be approximately equal to the proportion of the total of the toll revenues collected that are attributable to such segment divided by the total of such toll revenues collected;

“4. Study truck travel patterns along the Interstate 81 corridor and analyze policies that minimize the impact on local truck traffic;

“5. Identify incident management strategies corridor-wide;

“6. Ensure that any revenues collected on Interstate 81 be used only for the benefit of that corridor;

“7. Identify actions and policies that will be implemented to minimize the diversion of truck traffic from the Interstate 81 corridor, including the prohibition of through trucks on parallel routes;

“8. Determine potential solutions to address truck parking needs along the Interstate 81 corridor; and

“9. Assess the potential economic impacts on Virginia agriculture, manufacturing, and logistics sector companies utilizing the I-81 corridor from tolling only heavy commercial trucks.

“Technical assistance shall be provided to the Commonwealth Transportation Board by the Department of Transportation, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the Department of State Police. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commonwealth Transportation Board for this study, upon request.

“The Commonwealth Transportation Board shall complete its meetings by November 30, 2018, and shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an executive summary and a report of its findings and recommendations for publication as a House or Senate document. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports no later than the first day of the 2019 Regular Session of the General Assembly and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

Acts
2018, c. 743, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with the exclusive authority of the General Assembly to approve tolling on components of highways, bridges, or tunnels.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 374, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684, effective July 1, 2016, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, substituted “17 members” for “18 members” and “three ex officio members” for “four ex officio members”; and deleted “and the Executive Director of the Virginia Port Authority” following “Rail and Public Transportation”; in the second sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor” at the end; in the second paragraph, substituted “senior nonlegislative citizen member” for “Commissioner of Highways” and “and shall preside” for “and shall have voting privileges only in the event of a tie when he is presiding” in the second sentence, added the third sentence, and substituted “Commissioner of Highways” for “Executive Director of the Virginia Port Authority” in the last sentence.

§ 33.2-201.
Appointment requirements; statewide interest.

Of the members appointed to the Board, one member shall be a resident of the territory now included in the Bristol highway construction district, one in the Salem highway construction district, one in the Lynchburg highway construction district, one in the Staunton highway construction district, one in the Culpeper highway construction district, one in the Fredericksburg highway construction district, one in the Richmond highway construction district, one in the Hampton Roads highway construction district, and one in the Northern Virginia highway construction district. The remaining five members shall be appointed from the Commonwealth at large, provided that at least two reside in urbanized areas with populations greater than 200,000 and are designated as urban at-large members and at least two reside outside urbanized areas with populations greater than 200,000 and are designated as rural at-large members. The at-large members shall be appointed to represent rural and urban transportation needs and to be mindful of the concerns of seaports and seaport users, airports and airport users, railways and railway users, and mass transit and mass transit users. Each appointed member of the Board shall be primarily mindful of the best interest of the Commonwealth at large instead of the interests of the highway construction district from which chosen or of the transportation interest represented.

No member of a governing body of a locality shall be eligible, during the term of office for which he was elected or appointed, to serve as an appointed member of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-2; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-2; 1974, c. 462; 1982, c. 487; 1984, c. 748; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 2000, c. 49; 2014, c. 805; 2018, c. 828.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 828 substituted “urbanized areas with populations greater than 200,000” for “metropolitan statistical areas” twice; and added the second paragraph.

§ 33.2-202.
Meetings.

The Board shall meet at least once every three months and at such other times, on the call of the chairman or of a majority of the members, as may be deemed necessary to transact such business as may properly be brought before it. Six members shall constitute a quorum of the Board for all purposes. For a transportation project valued in excess of $25 million that is located wholly within a single highway construction district, the Board shall hold at least one hearing in the highway construction district where such project being considered is located to discuss such project prior to a meeting at which a vote to program funds pursuant to §

33.2-214

for such project will be taken.

It shall be the duty of the Board to keep accurate minutes of all meetings of the Board, in which shall be set forth all acts and proceedings of the Board in carrying out the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-5; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-6; 1974, c. 462; 2014, c. 805; 2016, c. 367.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 367 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

§ 33.2-203.
Salaries and expenses.

All salaries and expenses of the Board shall be paid from the state treasury out of the annual appropriation for the Board. Warrants for such salaries and expenses shall be issued by the Comptroller on certificates of the Commissioner of Highways to the parties entitled thereto and shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of the funds appropriated for that purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-10; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-10; 1974, c. 462; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-204.
Offices.

The main office of the Board, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall be located in the City of Richmond. In the discretion of the Commissioner of Highways, other offices of the Department of Transportation may be established in the various highway construction districts of the Commonwealth as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-6; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-7; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-205.
Oaths and bonds of members.

Each member of the Board shall, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, take an oath that he will faithfully and honestly execute the duties of the office during his term and each shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-9; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-9; 1974, c. 462; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “Each member of the Board shall, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, take an oath that he will faithfully and honestly execute the duties of the office during his term, and each shall give a bond in such penalty as may be fixed by the Governor conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the duties of his office and the full and proper accounting for all public funds and property coming into his possession or under his control. The premium on such bonds shall be paid out of the state treasury out of the annual appropriation for the Board.”

§ 33.2-206.
How testimony of members of Commonwealth Transportation Board and Commissioner of Highways taken in civil proceedings.

No member of the Board or the Commissioner of Highways shall be required to leave his office for the purpose of testifying in any suit, action, or other civil proceeding involving any of his official duties, but the deposition of any member of the Board or the Commissioner of Highways may be taken at the main office of the Board in Richmond, after reasonable notice in writing has been given to the adverse party.

Any deposition taken pursuant to this section may be read in the pending suit, action, or other civil proceeding. However, on motion to the court, filed at least 10 days before the commencement of the trial, the judge may, for good cause shown, require any member of the Board or the Commissioner of Highways to attend and testify ore tenus.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-3.1; 1966, c. 369; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-4; 1974, c. 462; 1995, cc. 195, 223; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-207.
Bookkeeping system.

The chairman of the Board shall, with the aid and advice of the Auditor of Public Accounts, cause to be maintained a complete and modern system of bookkeeping for the Department, and the books to be kept by the Department shall show in detail all receipts and disbursements of the Department, the source of such receipts, and the purpose, amount, and recipient of all disbursements.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-14; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-14; 1974, c. 462; 2014, c. 805.